Nebraska, session 109, LB12.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB12 LB12
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 25-228, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
25-228 (1) Except as otherwise provided in the State Tort Claims Act
and the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act, there shall not be any
time limitation for an action against Notwithstanding any other provision
of law:
(a) The There shall not be any time limitation for an action against
the individual or individuals directly causing an injury or injuries
suffered by a plaintiff when the plaintiff was a victim of a violation of
section 28-319.01 or 28-320.01 if such violation occurred (i) on or after
August 24, 2017, or (ii) prior to August 24, 2017, if such action was not
previously time barred; or and
(b) Any An action against any person or entity other than the
individual directly causing an injury or injuries suffered by a plaintiff
when the plaintiff was a victim of a violation of section 28-319.01 or
28-320.01 if such violation occurred (i) on or after the effective date
of this act or (ii) prior to the effective date of this act, if such
action was not previously time barred may only be brought within twelve
years after the plaintiff's twenty-first birthday.
(2) Criminal prosecution of a defendant under section 28-319.01 or
28-320.01 is not required to maintain a civil action for violation of
such sections.
Sec. 2. Original section 25-228, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-